Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2257.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 5-323, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE5-323. Disposition of fees; annual report Each month monies received from the registration and infrastructure fees received under this chapter for the numbering of watercraft shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the watercraft licensing fund. Each month, the department shall distribute the monies as follows: 1. All revenues collected pursuant to section 5-321, subsection A and section 5-326 shall be allocated as follows: (a) Sixty-five per cent fifty-five percent shall be deposited in the watercraft licensing fund. The watercraft licensing fund is to be used by the department for administering and enforcing this chapter, providing an information and education program relating to boating and boating safety and administering any aquatic invasive species program established under this title or title 17. These monies are subject to legislative appropriation. (b) Thirty-five per cent forty-five percent of such revenues shall be further allocated as follows: (i) Fifteen per cent Ten percent to the state lake improvement fund to be used as prescribed by section 5-382. (ii) Eighty-five per cent ninety percent to the law enforcement and boating safety fund to be used as prescribed by section 5-383. 2. All revenues collected from any additional registration fees collected pursuant to section 5-321, subsection C  D shall be paid to an account designated by a multi-county water conservation district established under title 48, chapter 22 to be used solely for the lower Colorado river multispecies conservation program and for no other purpose. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 5-383, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE5-383. Law enforcement and boating safety fund; boating law enforcement, personnel, equipment and training funding to counties A. A  The law enforcement and boating safety fund is established that consists consisting of monies distributed to the fund pursuant to sections 5-323, 5-395.01, 5-395.03, 5-396 and 5-397. The monies are subject to legislative appropriation. B. Only a board of supervisors of a county that has a law enforcement and boating safety program that was in existence before July 1, 1990 shall be eligible to receive law enforcement and boating safety fund monies.  The revenues allocated to the law enforcement and boating safety fund shall be allocated as follows: 1. 1.03 percent to apache County. 2. 10.45 percent to coconino county. 3. 7.35 percent to gila county. 4. 12.5 percent to la paz county. 5. 9.65 percent to maricopa county. 6. 49.22 percent to mohave county. 7. .5 percent to navajo county. 8. 9.3 percent to yuma county. C. The state treasurer shall administer the fund. Using an allocation formula as determined annually by the commission, The state treasurer shall distribute monies monthly from the law enforcement and boating safety fund to eligible counties as prescribed in subsection B of this section. D. In determining the allocation formula, the commission may consider the following: 1. The adequacy of existing county boating safety programs that include accident investigations. 2. The number of recreational days of use on water within the jurisdiction of the counties in areas of administrative authority. 3. The surface acreage of water within the jurisdiction of the counties in areas of administrative authority. 4. The county water safety record. 5. The ability of the county to constructively use additional monies. 6. The ratio of boating use to water surface within the jurisdiction of the counties in areas of administrative authority. 7. The ability of participating counties to provide continued funding of the program. 8. Annual input and feedback from the county boards of supervisors receiving funds. 9. Boat accident data for the waterways within the jurisdiction of the county. E. D. The monies distributed to a county board of supervisors shall be used by the law enforcement agencies of the county solely for boating law enforcement, personnel, equipment and training. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.